Idaho, session 2026, H0891.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3623, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3623. RETURNS AND PAYMENTS. (a) The taxes imposed by this act are
due and payable to the state tax commission monthly on or before the twenti-
eth day of the succeeding month.
(b) All moneys collected or received by the state tax commission from
the taxes, penalties, interest and fees imposed by this act shall be de-
posited with the state treasurer to be credited by him to the sales tax
account created by this act.
(c) On or before the twentieth day of the month a return shall be filed
with the state tax commission in such form as the state tax commission may
prescribe.
(d) For the purpose of the sales tax, a return shall be filed by every
seller. For the purposes of the use tax, a return shall be filed by every re-
tailer engaged in business in this state and by every person purchasing tan-
gible personal property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which is
subject to the use tax, who has not paid the use tax due to a retailer required
to collect the tax. Returns shall be signed by the person required to file
the return or by his duly authorized agent.
(e) For the purposes of the sales tax, the return shall show the total
sales at retail subject to tax under this act during the reporting period.
For the purposes of the use tax, in case of a return filed by a retailer, the
return shall show the total sales price of the property sold by him, the stor-
age, use, or consumption of which property became subject to the use tax dur-
ing the reporting period; in the case of a return filed by a purchaser, the
return shall show the total sales price of the property purchased by him, the
storage, use, or consumption of which became subject to the use tax during
the reporting period.
(f) The return shall show the amount of the taxes for the period covered
by the return and such other information as the state tax commission deems
necessary for the proper administration of this act.
(g) The person required to file the return shall mail or deliver the re-
turn together with a remittance of any tax due to the state tax commission for
the reporting period.
(h) The state tax commission, if it deems it necessary in order to in-
sure payment to or facilitate the collection by the state of taxes, may re-
quire returns for periods other than monthly periods.


(i) For the purposes of the sales tax, gross amounts from rentals or
leases of tangible personal property which may be subject to tax under this
act shall be reported and the tax paid in accordance with such rules as the
state tax commission may prescribe.
(j) The state tax commission for good cause may extend, for not to ex-
ceed one (1) month, the time for making any return or paying any amount re-
quired to be paid under this act.
(k) Any person to whom an extension is granted and who pays the tax
within the period for which the extension is granted shall pay, in addition
to the tax, interest at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code,
from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension until
the day of payment.
(l) Upon the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle subject to sales
or use tax, a certificate of title will be issued to the new owner only upon
presentation of evidence of payment of sales or use tax on the transaction.
(m) The owner of a motor vehicle or trailer required to be registered
by the laws of this state shall, upon demand, furnish to the officer issuing
such registration, satisfactory evidence that any sales or use tax to which
such motor vehicle or trailer is subject has been paid to this state before
any such registration shall be issued.
(n) Retail sales of tangible personal property through a vending ma-
chine which are taxable upon the purchase price paid by the owner or operator
of the vending machine pursuant to subsection (e) of section 63-3613, Idaho
Code, shall be reported upon the sales tax return of the owner or operator of
the vending machine in the manner by which the tax commission may by rule pre-
scribe.
(o) A seller who collects sales tax from a buyer when no sales tax was
due shall be entitled to a credit against the use tax owed by the seller on
that transaction pursuant to section 63-3621, Idaho Code, for any "use" as
defined in section 63-3615(b), Idaho Code. The amount of the credit shall
not exceed the amount of use tax due to the state with respect to that trans-
action. When credits have been taken by the seller on transactions where use
tax was owed instead of sales tax, no additional credits shall be allowed un-
der this subsection for subsequent transactions after the seller has been
made aware that use tax was owed instead of sales tax. If a buyer who has
paid sales tax when no sales tax was due requests a refund from the seller,
the seller shall refund the amount of sales tax paid by the buyer. The seller
may take a credit or seek a refund from the state tax commission equal to the
amount of sales tax refunded to the buyer less the use tax due by the seller.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.